Massachusetts, session 194th, H3971.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
(a) There is hereby established, pursuant to section 2A of chapter 4 of the General Laws,
a special legislative commission to study the feasibility and efficacy of placing the registries of
deeds for county governments that have not been abolished under the oversight of the secretary
of the commonwealth. As part of the study, the special legislative commission may seek public
comments and input.
(b) The special legislative commission shall consist of the following members: the chairs
of the joint committee on state administration and regulatory oversight, who shall serve as co-
chairs for the commission; 2 members appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;
2 members appointed by the president of the senate; 1 member appointed by the minority leader
of the house of representatives; 1 member appointed by the minority leader of the senate; the
secretary of the commonwealth or the secretary’s designee; the secretary of administration and
of 2

finance or the secretary’s designee; and 3 members to be appointed by the governor, 1 of whom
shall be a current or former register of deeds and 1 of whom shall be a representative from the
Massachusetts Association of County Commissioners, Inc.
(c) Within 180 days after the effective date of this act, the special legislative commission
shall submit a report, including legislative recommendations, if any, to the clerks of the house of
representatives and senate, who shall forward the report to the joint committee on state
administration and regulatory oversight, the house and senate committees on ways and means
and the executive office for administration and finance.
of 2